California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 526.)
-------------------------------------------

6735.

(a) All civil (including structural and geotechnical) engineering plans, calculations, specifications, and reports (hereinafter referred to as “documents”) shall be prepared by, or under the responsible charge of, a licensed civil engineer and shall include his or her name and license number. Interim documents shall include a notation as to the intended purpose of the document, such as “preliminary,” “not for construction,” “for plan check only,” or “for review only.” All civil engineering plans and specifications that are permitted or that are to be released for construction shall bear the signature and seal or stamp of the licensee and the date of signing and sealing or stamping. All final civil engineering calculations and reports shall bear the signature and seal or stamp of the licensee, and the date of signing and
 sealing or stamping. If civil engineering plans are required to be signed and sealed or stamped and have multiple sheets, the signature, seal or stamp, and date of signing and sealing or stamping shall appear on each sheet of the plans. If civil engineering specifications, calculations, and reports are required to be signed and sealed or stamped and have multiple pages, the signature, seal or stamp, and date of signing and sealing or stamping shall appear at a minimum on the title sheet, cover sheet, or signature sheet.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), a licensed civil engineer who signs civil engineering documents shall not be responsible for damage caused by subsequent changes to or uses of those documents, if the subsequent changes or uses, including changes or uses made by state or local governmental agencies, are not authorized or approved by the licensed civil engineer who originally signed the documents, provided that the engineering service rendered by the civil engineer who signed the documents was not also a proximate cause of the damage.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 430, Sec. 4.   (AB 181)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

6735.1.

The signing of civil engineering plans, specifications, reports, or documents which relate to the design of fixed works shall not impose a legal duty or responsibility upon the person signing the plans, specifications, reports, or documents to supervise the construction of engineering structures or the construction of the fixed works which are the subject of the plans, specifications, reports, or documents. However, nothing in this section shall preclude a civil engineer and a client from entering into a contractual agreement which includes a mutually acceptable arrangement for the provision of construction supervision services. Nothing contained in this
 subdivision shall modify the liability of a civil engineer who undertakes, contractually or otherwise, the provision of construction supervision services for rendering those services.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1507, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

6735.3.

(a) All electrical engineering plans, specifications, calculations, and reports (hereinafter referred to as “documents”) prepared by, or under the responsible charge of, a licensed electrical engineer shall include his or her name and license number. Interim documents shall include a notation as to the intended purpose of the document, such as “preliminary,” “not for construction,” “for plan check only,” or
 “for review only.” All electrical engineering plans and specifications that are permitted or that are to be released for construction shall bear the signature and seal or stamp of the licensee and the date of signing and sealing or stamping. All final electrical engineering calculations and reports shall bear the signature and seal or stamp of the licensee and the date of signing and sealing or stamping. If electrical engineering plans are required to be signed and sealed and have multiple sheets, the signature, seal or stamp, and date of signing and sealing or stamping shall appear on each sheet of the plans. If electrical engineering specifications, calculations, and reports are required to be signed and sealed or stamped and have multiple pages, the signature, seal or stamp, and date of signing and sealing or stamping shall appear at a minimum on the title sheet, cover sheet, or signature sheet.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), a
 licensed electrical engineer who signs electrical engineering documents shall not be responsible for damage caused by subsequent changes to or uses of those documents, if the subsequent changes or uses, including changes or uses made by state or local governmental agencies, are not authorized or approved by the licensed electrical engineer who originally signed the documents, provided that the engineering service rendered by the electrical engineer who signed the documents was not also a proximate cause of the damage.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 368, Sec. 2.   (AB 645)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

6735.4.

(a) All mechanical engineering plans, specifications, calculations, and reports (hereinafter referred to as “documents”) prepared by, or under the responsible charge of, a licensed mechanical engineer shall include his or her name and license number. Interim documents shall include a notation as to the intended purpose of the document, such as “preliminary,” “not for construction,” “for plan check only,” or
 “for review only.” All mechanical engineering plans and specifications that are permitted or that are to be released for construction shall bear the signature and seal or stamp of the licensee and the date of signing and sealing or stamping. All final mechanical engineering calculations and reports shall bear the signature and seal or stamp of the licensee and the date of signing and sealing or stamping. If mechanical engineering plans are required to be signed and sealed and have multiple sheets, the signature, seal or stamp, and date of signing and sealing or stamping shall appear on each sheet of the plans. If mechanical engineering specifications, calculations, and reports are required to be signed and sealed or stamped and have multiple pages, the signature, seal or stamp, and date of signing and sealing or stamping shall appear at a minimum on the title sheet, cover sheet, or signature sheet.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), a
 licensed mechanical engineer who signs mechanical engineering documents shall not be responsible for damage caused by subsequent changes to or uses of those documents, if the subsequent changes or uses, including changes or uses made by state or local governmental agencies, are not authorized or approved by the licensed mechanical engineer who originally signed the documents, provided that the engineering service rendered by the mechanical engineer who signed the documents was not also a proximate cause of the damage.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 368, Sec. 3.   (AB 645)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

6735.5.

The use of the word “certify” or “certification” by a registered professional engineer in the practice of professional engineering or land surveying constitutes an expression of professional opinion regarding those facts or findings which are the subject of the certification, and does not constitute a warranty or guarantee, either expressed or implied.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 229, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

6735.6.

If a registered civil engineer is required to provide as built, as constructed, or record plans for improvements or grading, which plans show changes during the construction process, the following shall apply:

(a) If the registered civil engineer provided construction phase services on the project that include supervision of the construction of engineering structures, the plans shall be based upon the field observations of the registered civil engineer and his or her agents, and information received
 from the project owner, project contractors, and public agencies.

(b) If the registered civil engineer did not provide construction phase services on the project that include supervision of the construction of engineering structures, the plans shall be based on information received from the project owner, project contractors, and public agencies, but need not be based upon a field verification or investigation of the improvements or grades, unless the registered civil engineer is engaged to provide such field verification services.

(c) The registered civil engineer shall not be required to include a certificate or statement on as built, as constructed, or record plans that is inconsistent with or varies from the provisions of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 275, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

6736.

No person shall use the title, “structural engineer,” or any combination of these words or abbreviations thereof, unless he or she is a licensed civil engineer in this state and unless he or she has been found qualified as a structural engineer according to the rules and regulations established for structural engineers by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 657, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

6736.1.

(a) No person shall use the title, “soil engineer,” “soils engineer,” or “geotechnical engineer,” or any combination of these words or abbreviations thereof, unless he or she is a licensed civil engineer in this state and files an application to use the appropriate title with the board and the board determines the applicant is qualified to use the requested title.

(b) The board shall establish qualifications and standards to use the title “soil engineer,” “soils engineer,” or
 “geotechnical engineer.” However, each applicant shall demonstrate a minimum of four years qualifying experience beyond that required for licensure as a civil engineer, and shall pass the examination specified by the board.

(c) For purposes of this section, “qualifying experience” means proof of responsible charge of soil engineering projects in at least 50 percent of the major areas of soil engineering, as determined by the board.

(d) Nothing contained in this chapter requires existing references to “soil engineering,” “soils engineering,” “geotechnical engineering,” “soil engineer,” “soils engineer,” or “geotechnical engineer,” in local agency ordinances, building codes, regulations, or policies, to mean that those activities or persons must be registered or authorized to use the relevant title or authority.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 657, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

6737.

An architect, who holds a certificate to practice architecture in this State under the provisions of Chapter 3 of Division 3 of this code insofar as he practices architecture in its various branches, is exempt from registration under the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1709.)
-------------------------------------------

6737.1.

(a) This chapter does not prohibit any person from preparing plans, drawings, or specifications for any of the following:

(1) Single-family dwellings of woodframe construction not more than two stories and basement in height.

(2) Multiple dwellings containing no more than four dwelling units of woodframe construction not more than two stories and basement in height. However, this paragraph shall not be construed
 as allowing an unlicensed person to design multiple clusters of up to four dwelling units each to form apartment or condominium complexes where the total exceeds four units on any lawfully divided lot.

(3) Garages or other structures appurtenant to buildings described under subdivision (a), of woodframe construction not more than two stories and basement in height.

(4) Agricultural and ranch buildings of woodframe construction, unless the building official having jurisdiction deems that an undue risk to the public health, safety or welfare is involved.

(b) If any portion of any structure exempted by this section deviates from substantial compliance with conventional framing requirements for woodframe construction found in the most recent edition of Title 24 of the California Code of Regulations or tables of
 limitation for woodframe construction, as defined by the applicable building code duly adopted by the local jurisdiction or the state, the building official having jurisdiction shall require the preparation of plans, drawings, specifications, or calculations for that portion by, or under the responsible charge of, a licensed engineer, or by, or under the responsible control of, an architect licensed pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 5500). The documents for that portion shall bear the stamp and signature of the licensee who is responsible for their preparation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 607, Sec. 27.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

6737.2.

Nothing in this chapter shall prohibit a civil engineer, registered under the provisions of this chapter, from practicing or offering to practice any engineering in connection with or supplementary to civil engineering studies or activities as defined in Section 6731.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1463.)
-------------------------------------------

6737.3.

A contractor licensed under Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 7000) of Division 3 is exempt from the provisions of this chapter relating to the practice of electrical or mechanical engineering so long as the services he or she holds himself or herself out as able to perform or does perform, which services are subject to the provisions of this chapter, are performed by, or under the responsible charge of a registered electrical or mechanical engineer insofar as the electrical or mechanical engineer practices the branch of engineering for which he or she is
 registered.

This section shall not prohibit a licensed contractor, while engaged in the business of contracting for the installation of electrical or mechanical systems or facilities, from designing those systems or facilities in accordance with applicable construction codes and standards for work to be performed and supervised by that contractor within the classification for which his or her license is issued, or from preparing electrical or mechanical shop or field drawings for work which he or she has contracted to perform. Nothing in this section is intended to imply that a licensed contractor may design work which is to be installed by another person.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 607, Sec. 28.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

6738.

(a) This chapter does not prohibit one or more civil, electrical, or mechanical engineers from practicing or offering to practice, within the scope of their license, civil (including geotechnical and structural), electrical, or mechanical engineering as a sole proprietorship, partnership, limited liability partnership, firm, or corporation (hereinafter called business), if all of the following requirements are met:

(1) A civil, electrical, or mechanical engineer currently licensed in this state is an owner, partner, or officer in charge of the engineering practice of the business.

(2) All civil, electrical, or mechanical engineering services are performed by, or under the responsible charge of, a
 professional engineer licensed in the appropriate branch of professional engineering.

(3) If the business name of a California engineering business contains the name of any person, then that person shall be licensed as a professional engineer, a licensed land surveyor, a licensed architect, or a geologist registered under the Geologist and Geophysicist Act (Chapter 12.5 (commencing with Section 7800)). Any offer, promotion, or advertisement by the business that contains the name of any individual in the business, other than by use of the name of an individual in the business name, shall clearly and specifically designate the license or registration discipline of each individual named.

(b) An out-of-state business with a branch office in this state shall meet the requirements of subdivisions (a) and (h) and shall have an owner, partner, or officer who is in charge of the
 engineering work in the branch in this state, who is licensed in this state, and who is physically present at the branch office in this state on a regular basis. However, the name of the business may contain the name of any person not licensed in this state if that person is appropriately registered or licensed in another state. Any offer, promotion, or advertisement that contains the name of any individual in the business, other than by use of the names of the individuals in the business name, shall clearly and specifically designate the license or registration discipline of each individual named.

(c) The business name of a California engineering business may be a fictitious name. However, if the fictitious name includes the name of any person, the requirements of paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) shall be met.

(d) A person not licensed under this chapter may also be a partner or
 an officer of a civil, electrical, or mechanical engineering business if the requirements of subdivision (a) are met. This section does not permit a person who is not licensed under this chapter to be the sole owner of a civil, electrical, or mechanical engineering business, unless otherwise exempt under this chapter.

(e) This section shall not prevent the use of the name of any business engaged in rendering civil, electrical, or mechanical engineering services, including the use by any lawful successor or survivor, that lawfully was in existence on December 31, 1987. However, the business is subject to paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (a).

(f) A business engaged in rendering civil, electrical, or mechanical engineering services may use in its name the name of a deceased or retired person provided all of the following conditions are satisfied:

(1) The person’s name had been used in the name of the business, or a predecessor in interest of the business, before and after the death or retirement of the person.

(2) The person shall have been an owner, partner, or officer of the business, or an owner, partner, or officer of the predecessor in interest of the business.

(3) The person shall have been licensed as a professional engineer, or a land surveyor, or an architect, or a geologist, (A) by the appropriate licensing board if that person is operating a place of business or practice in this state, or (B) by the applicable state board if no place of business existed in this state.

(4) The person, if retired, has consented to the use of the name and does not permit the use of the name in the title of
 another professional engineering business in this state during the period of the consent. However, the retired person may use their name as the name of a new or purchased business if it is not identical in every respect to that person’s name as used in the former business.

(5) The business shall be subject to the provisions of paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (a).

(g) This section does not affect the provisions of Sections 6731.2 and 8726.1.

(h) (1) A current organization record form shall be filed with the board for all businesses engaged in rendering civil, electrical, or mechanical engineering services.

(2) The filing of the organization record form described in paragraph (1) shall be accompanied by documentary evidence
 that demonstrates compliance with the provisions described in paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (a).

(i) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2034, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 302, Sec. 1) by Stats. 2024, Ch. 588, Sec. 6.5.   (AB 3253)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2034, by its own provisions.    See later operative version, as amended by Sec. 7.5 of Stats. 2024, Ch. 588.)
-------------------------------------------

6738.

(a) This chapter does not prohibit one or more civil, electrical, or mechanical engineers from practicing or offering to practice within the scope of their license civil (including geotechnical and structural), electrical, or mechanical engineering as a sole proprietorship, partnership, firm, or corporation (hereinafter called business), if all of the following requirements are met:

(1) A civil, electrical, or mechanical engineer currently licensed in this state is an owner, partner, or officer in charge of the engineering practice of the business.

(2) All civil, electrical, or mechanical engineering services are performed by, or under the responsible charge of, a professional engineer licensed in the
 appropriate branch of professional engineering.

(3) If the business name of a California engineering business contains the name of any person, then that person shall be licensed as a professional engineer, a licensed land surveyor, a licensed architect, or a geologist registered under the Geologist and Geophysicist Act (Chapter 12.5 (commencing with Section 7800)). Any offer, promotion, or advertisement by the business that contains the name of any individual in the business, other than by use of the name of an individual in the business name, shall clearly and specifically designate the license or registration discipline of each individual named.

(b) An out-of-state business with a branch office in this state shall meet the requirements of subdivisions (a) and (h) and shall have an owner, partner, or officer who is in charge of the engineering work in the branch in this state,
 who is licensed in this state, and who is physically present at the branch office in this state on a regular basis. However, the name of the business may contain the name of any person not licensed in this state if that person is appropriately registered or licensed in another state. Any offer, promotion, or advertisement that contains the name of any individual in the business, other than by use of the names of the individuals in the business name, shall clearly and specifically designate the license or registration discipline of each individual named.

(c) The business name of a California engineering business may be a fictitious name. However, if the fictitious name includes the name of any person, the requirements of paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) shall be met.

(d) A person not licensed under this chapter may also be a partner or an officer of a civil, electrical, or
 mechanical engineering business if the requirements of subdivision (a) are met. This section does not permit a person who is not licensed under this chapter to be the sole owner of a civil, electrical, or mechanical engineering business, unless otherwise exempt under this chapter.

(e) This section shall not prevent the use of the name of any business engaged in rendering civil, electrical, or mechanical engineering services, including the use by any lawful successor or survivor, that lawfully was in existence on December 31, 1987. However, the business is subject to paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (a).

(f) A business engaged in rendering civil, electrical, or mechanical engineering services may use in its name the name of a deceased or retired person provided all of the following conditions are satisfied:

(1) The person’s name had been used in the name of the business, or a predecessor in interest of the business, before and after the death or retirement of the person.

(2) The person shall have been an owner, partner, or officer of the business, or an owner, partner, or officer of the predecessor in interest of the business.

(3) The person shall have been licensed as a professional engineer, or a land surveyor, or an architect, or a geologist, (A) by the appropriate licensing board if that person is operating a place of business or practice in this state, or (B) by the applicable state board if no place of business existed in this state.

(4) The person, if retired, has consented to the use of the name and does not permit the use of the name in the title of another professional engineering business in this
 state during the period of the consent. However, the retired person may use their name as the name of a new or purchased business if it is not identical in every respect to that person’s name as used in the former business.

(5) The business shall be subject to the provisions of paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (a).

(g) This section does not affect the provisions of Sections 6731.2 and 8726.1.

(h) (1) A current organization record form shall be filed with the board for all businesses engaged in rendering civil, electrical, or mechanical engineering services.

(2) The filing of the organization record form described in paragraph (1) shall be accompanied by documentary evidence that demonstrates compliance with the provisions
 described in paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (a).

(i) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2034.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 302, Sec. 2) by Stats. 2024, Ch. 588, Sec. 7.5.   (AB 3253)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Operative January 1, 2034, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

6739.

Officers and employees of the United States of America practicing solely as such officers or employees are exempt from registration under the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1709.)
-------------------------------------------

6740.

A subordinate to a civil, electrical or mechanical engineer licensed under this chapter, or a subordinate to a civil, electrical or mechanical engineer exempted from licensure under this chapter, insofar as he or she acts solely in that capacity, is exempt from licensure under the provisions of this chapter. This exemption, however, does not permit any such subordinate to practice civil, electrical or mechanical engineering in his or her own right or to use the titles listed in Sections 6732, 6736, and 6736.1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 658, Sec. 99.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

6741.

Any person, firm, partnership, or corporation is exempt from registration under the provisions of this chapter who meets all the following:

(a) Is a nonresident of the State of California.

(b) Is legally qualified in another state to practice as a civil, electrical, or mechanical engineer.

(c) Does not maintain a regular place of business in this state.

(d) Offers to but does not practice civil, electrical, or mechanical engineering in this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1006, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

6742.

Any person, firm, or corporation holding a license as real estate broker or real estate salesperson, when making appraisals and valuations of real estate properties, while engaged in the business or acting in the capacity of a real estate broker or a real estate salesperson, within the meaning of the Real Estate Law is exempt from registration under the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 177, Sec. 1.   (AB 685)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

6743.

This chapter does not affect Chapter 15 of Division 3 of this code, relating to surveyors, except insofar as this chapter is expressly made applicable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1709.)
-------------------------------------------

6744.

This chapter does not require registration for the purpose of practicing civil engineering, by an individual, a member of a firm or partnership, or by an officer of a corporation on or in connection with property owned or leased by the individual, firm, partnership, or corporation, unless the civil engineering work to be performed involves the public health or safety or the health and safety of employees of the individual, firm, partnership or corporation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1709.)
-------------------------------------------

6745.

This chapter does not prohibit any person, firm or corporation from furnishing, either alone or with subcontractors, labor and materials, with or without plans, drawings, specifications, instruments of service or other data covering such labor and materials:

(a) For store fronts, interior alterations or additions, fixtures, cabinet work, furniture or other appliances or equipment.

(b) For any work necessary to provide for their installation.

(c) For any alterations or additions to any
 building necessary to or attendant upon the installation of such store fronts, interior alterations or additions, fixtures, cabinet work, furniture, appliances or equipment; provided, such alterations do not affect the structural safety of the building.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1709.)
-------------------------------------------

6746.

Plans, specifications, reports and documents relating to communication lines and equipment prepared by employees of communications companies which come under the jurisdiction of the Public Utilities Commission, and by employees of contractors while engaged in work on communication equipment for communications companies which come under the jurisdiction of the Public Utilities Commission, are not subject to the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1708.)
-------------------------------------------

6746.1.

The provisions of this chapter pertaining to licensure of professional engineers, other than civil engineers, do not apply to employees in the communications industry, nor to the employees of contractors while engaged in work on communications equipment. However, those employees may not use any of the titles listed in Sections 6732, 6736, and 6736.1, unless licensed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 658, Sec. 100.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

6747.

(a) This chapter, except for those provisions that apply to civil engineers and civil engineering, shall not apply to the performance of engineering work by a manufacturing, mining, public utility, research and development, or other industrial corporation, or by employees of that corporation, provided that work is in connection with, or incidental to, the products, systems, or services of that corporation or its affiliates.

(b) For purposes of this section, “employees” also
 includes consultants, temporary employees, contract employees, and those persons hired pursuant to third-party contracts.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 705, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

6748.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 6747, this chapter applies to engineering work approved by a person employed by a privately or publicly owned utility in the planning, designing, construction, operation, or maintenance of a nuclear powerplant which is owned or operated by the utility.

(b) Any engineering work subject to subdivision (a) shall be approved by a professional engineer registered in the applicable discipline of engineering specified in Section 6732.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 368, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

6749.

(a) A professional engineer shall use a written contract when contracting to provide professional engineering services to a client pursuant to this chapter. The written contract shall be executed by the professional engineer and the client or the client’s representative prior to the professional engineer commencing work, unless the client knowingly states in writing that work may be commenced before the contract is executed. The written contract shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) A description of the services to be provided to the client by the professional engineer.

(2) A description of any basis of compensation applicable to the contract, and the method of payment agreed
 upon by the parties.

(3) The name, address, and license or certificate number of the professional engineer, and the name and address of the client.

(4) A description of the procedure that the professional engineer and the client will use to accommodate additional services.

(5) A description of the procedure to be used by both parties to terminate the contract.

(6) Disclosure of any existence of a current professional liability insurance policy covering the professional engineer in responsible charge of the services.

(b) This section shall not apply to any of the following:

(1) Professional engineering services rendered by a
 professional engineer for which the client will not pay compensation.

(2) A professional engineer who has a current or prior contractual relationship with the client to provide engineering services, and that client has paid the professional engineer all of the fees that are due under the contract.

(3) If the client knowingly states in writing after full disclosure of this section that a contract which complies with the requirements of this section is not required.

(4) Professional engineering services rendered by a professional engineer to any of the following:

(A) A professional engineer licensed or registered under this chapter.

(B) A land surveyor licensed under Chapter 15 (commencing
 with Section 8700).

(C) An architect licensed under Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 5500).

(D) A contractor licensed under Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 7000).

(E) A geologist or a geophysicist licensed under Chapter 12.5 (commencing with Section 7800).

(F) A manufacturing, mining, public utility, research and development, or other industrial corporation, if the services are provided in connection with or incidental to the products, systems, or services of that corporation or its affiliates.

(G) A public agency.

(c) “Written contract” as used in this section includes a contract that is in electronic
 form.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 588, Sec. 8.   (AB 3253)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Registration [6750. - 6767.]

6750.

(a) An application for licensure as a professional engineer or certification as an engineer-in-training shall be made to the board on the prescribed form, with all statements made therein under oath, and shall be accompanied by the fee prescribed by this chapter. An application for licensure as a professional engineer shall specify, additionally, the branch of engineering in which the applicant desires licensure.

(b) The board may authorize an organization specified by the board pursuant to Section 6754 to receive directly from applicants payment of the examination fees charged by that organization as payment for examination materials and
 services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 415, Sec. 10.   (SB 1491)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

6751.

(a) The applicant for certification as an engineer-in-training shall comply with all of the following:

(1) Not have committed acts or crimes constituting grounds for denial of licensure under Section 480.

(2) Successfully pass the first division of the examination.

(3) Satisfactorily complete three years or more of postsecondary engineering education, three years or more of engineering experience, or a combination of postsecondary education and experience in engineering totaling three years.

(b) The board need not verify the
 applicant’s eligibility for certification as an engineer-in-training other than to require the applicant to sign a statement of eligibility on the application form.

(c) The applicant for licensure as a professional engineer shall comply with all of the following:

(1) Not have committed acts or crimes constituting grounds for denial of licensure under Section 480.

(2) Furnish evidence of six years or more of qualifying experience in engineering work satisfactory to the board evidencing that the applicant is competent to practice the character of engineering in the branch for which he or she is applying for licensure.

(3) Be certified as an engineer-in-training in this state, be certified as an engineer-in-training or engineer intern in another state or
 territory of the United States, or be exempt therefrom.

(4) Successfully pass the second division of the examination.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 236, Sec. 1.   (SB 1165)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

6751.2.

The board may consider the professional experience and education acquired by applicants outside the United States which in the opinion of the board is equivalent to the minimum requirements of the board established by regulation for professional experience and education in this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 895.)
-------------------------------------------

6751.5.

The board shall by rule establish the criteria to be used for approving curricula of schools of engineering.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 2084.)
-------------------------------------------

6752.

An applicant for registration as a civil engineer must have gained his experience under the direction of a civil engineer legally qualified to practice.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 92.)
-------------------------------------------

6753.

With respect to applicants for licensure as professional engineers, the board:

(a) Shall give credit as qualifying experience of four years, for graduation with an engineering degree from a college or university the curriculum of which has been approved by the board.

(b) May at its discretion give credit as qualifying experience up to a maximum of two years, for graduation with an engineering degree from a nonapproved engineering curriculum or graduation with an engineering technology degree in an approved engineering technology curriculum.

(c) May at its discretion give credit as qualifying experience of up to one-half year, for each year of successfully completed postsecondary study in an engineering curriculum up to a maximum of four years credit. A year of study shall be at least 32 semester units or 48 quarter units.

(d) May at its discretion give credit as qualifying experience not in excess of five years, for a postgraduate degree in a school of engineering with a board approved undergraduate or postgraduate curriculum.

(e) May at its discretion give credit as qualifying experience for engineering teaching, not in excess of one year, if of a character satisfactory to the board.

The sum of qualifying experience credit for subdivision (a) to (e), inclusive, shall not exceed five years.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 658, Sec. 102.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

6753.5.

All applicants shall be given equal credit for engineering experience in the armed forces of United States as with any other comparable engineering experience.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1709.)
-------------------------------------------

6754.

Examination for licensure shall be held at such times and places as the board shall determine.

The second division of the examination for all branches specified in Section 6732 shall be administered at least once each year.

Work of the board relating to examination and licensure may be divided into committees as the board shall direct. The scope of examinations and the methods of procedure may be prescribed by board rule.
